Vermont, session 2025-2026, S53.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 26 V.S.A. chapter 84 is added to read:
CHAPTER 84. COMMUNITY-BASED PERINATAL DOULAS
§ 4171. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Certified community-based perinatal doula” means a community-
based perinatal doula who holds a certificate issued pursuant to this chapter.
(2) “Community-based doula” means an individual who provides doula
services to under-resourced and marginalized populations at low or no cost,
often through a community-based agency.
(3) “Community-based perinatal doula” means a community-based
doula who provides doula services to individuals during the perinatal period.
(4) “Director” means the Director of the Office of Professional
Regulation.
(5) “Doula” means a nonclinical, nonmedical individual who provides
direct emotional and physical support and educational and informational
services to birthing individuals before, during, and after labor and childbirth.
(6) “Perinatal” means the period of time encompassing pregnancy,
childbirth, and up to one year postpartum.
VT LEG #384207 v.1

No. 50 Page 2 of 8
2025
§ 4172. PROHIBITIONS; PENALTIES
(a) Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit the provision of
doula services by a noncertified individual, provided that no person shall use in
connection with the person’s name any letters, words, or insignia indicating or
implying that the person is a State certified community-based perinatal doula
unless the person is certified in accordance with this chapter.
(b) A person who violates this section shall be subject to the penalties set
forth in 3 V.S.A. § 127(c).
§ 4173. DUTIES OF THE DIRECTOR
(a) The Director shall:
(1) provide general information to applicants for certification as certified
community-based perinatal doulas;
(2) receive applicants for certification; grant and renew certifications in
accordance with this chapter; and deny, revoke, suspend, reinstate, or condition
certifications as directed by an administrative law officer;
(3) explain appeal procedures to certified community-based perinatal
doulas and applicants;
(4) explain complaint procedures to the public;
(5) prepare and maintain a registry of certified community-based
perinatal doulas;
(6) administer fees collected in accordance with this chapter and
3 V.S.A. § 125; and
VT LEG #384207 v.1

No. 50 Page 3 of 8
2025
(7) refer all disciplinary matters to an administrative law officer
established under 3 V.S.A. § 129(j).
(b) The Director, after consultation with the advisor appointees, may adopt
rules in accordance with 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 as needed to perform the
Director’s duties under this chapter.
§ 4174. ADVISOR APPOINTEES
(a) The Secretary of State shall appoint two certified community-based
perinatal doulas to serve as advisors in matters relating to community-based
perinatal doulas. The advisors shall be appointed as set forth in 3 V.S.A.
§ 129b and serve at the pleasure of the Secretary. One of the initial
appointments may be for less than a full term. Appointees shall not have less
than three years’ experience providing community-based perinatal doula
services immediately preceding appointment and shall be actively engaged in
delivering community-based perinatal doula services in Vermont during
incumbency.
(b) The Director shall seek the advice of the community-based perinatal
doula advisors in carrying out the provisions of this chapter. The advisor
appointees shall be entitled to per diem compensation and reimbursement of
expenses as permitted under 32 V.S.A. § 1010 for attendance at any meeting
called by the Director for this purpose.
VT LEG #384207 v.1

No. 50 Page 4 of 8
2025
§ 4175. ELIGIBILITY
To be eligible for certification as a certified community-based perinatal
doula, an applicant shall complete and submit an application in the manner
prescribed by the Director by rule, accompanied by the applicable fees, and
evidence satisfactory to the Director that the applicant:
(1) is at least 18 years of age;
(2) has sufficient and appropriate competencies in community-based
perinatal doula services, whether acquired through experience, mentorship,
training, formal education, or a combination of these, as determined by the
Director by rule; and
(3) has passed any criminal history background or registry checks
required by the Director by rule.
§ 4176. CERTIFICATE RENEWAL
A community-based perinatal doula certification shall be renewed every
two years upon application, payment of the required fee in accordance with
3 V.S.A. § 125, and proof of compliance with any continuing education or
demonstrated competency requirements established by rule.
§ 4177. UNPROFESSIONAL CONDUCT
(a) Unprofessional conduct means misusing a title in professional activity
and any of the conduct listed in 3 V.S.A. § 129a, whether committed by a
certified community-based perinatal doula or an applicant.
VT LEG #384207 v.1

No. 50 Page 5 of 8
2025
(b) The Office of Professional Regulation may discipline a certified
community-based perinatal doula for unprofessional conduct as provided in
3 V.S.A. § 129a.
Sec. 2. 3 V.S.A. § 122 is amended to read:
§ 122. OFFICE OF PROFESSIONAL REGULATION
The Office of Professional Regulation is created within the Office of the
Secretary of State. The Office shall have a director who shall be qualified by
education and professional experience to perform the duties of the position.
The Director of the Office of Professional Regulation shall be a classified
position with the Office of the Secretary of State. The following boards or
professions are attached to the Office of Professional Regulation:
* * *
(54) Community-Based Perinatal Doulas
Sec. 3. 3 V.S.A. § 123(j) is amended to read:
(j)(1) The Office may inquire into the criminal background histories of
applicants for initial licensure and for license renewal of any Office-issued
credential, including a license, certification, registration, or specialty
designation for the following professions:
* * *
(M) occupational therapists licensed under 26 V.S.A. chapter 71; and
(N) peer providers and peer recovery support specialists certified
under 26 V.S.A. chapter 60; and
VT LEG #384207 v.1

No. 50 Page 6 of 8
2025
(O) community-based perinatal doulas certified under 26 V.S.A.
chapter 84.
* * *
Sec. 4. 3 V.S.A. § 125 is amended to read:
§ 125. FEES
* * *
(b) Unless otherwise provided by law, the following fees shall apply to all
professions regulated by the Director in consultation with advisor appointees
under Title 26:
* * *
(2) Application for licensure or certification, $115.00, except application
for:
* * *
(R) Community-based perinatal doulas, $75.00.
* * *
(4) Biennial renewal, $275.00, except biennial renewal for:
* * *
(W) Community-based perinatal doulas, $120.00.
* * *
Sec. 5. 33 V.S.A. § 1901n is added to read:
§ 1901n. MEDICAID COVERAGE FOR DOULA SERVICES
VT LEG #384207 v.1

No. 50 Page 7 of 8
2025
(a) As used in this section, “certified community-based perinatal doula”
means a community-based perinatal doula who holds a certificate issued
pursuant to 26 V.S.A. chapter 84.
(b)(1) The Department of Vermont Health Access shall provide
reimbursement to a certified community-based perinatal doula for providing
direct emotional and physical support and educational and informational
services to birthing individuals covered by Medicaid during pregnancy, labor
and delivery, and the postpartum period, regardless of the outcome of the
pregnancy.
(2) A certified community-based perinatal doula shall not receive
reimbursement for travel time or mileage expenses.
Sec. 6. MEDICAID REIMBURSEMENT FOR DOULA SERVICES;
LEGISLATIVE INTENT
It is the intent of the General Assembly that the Department of Vermont
Health Access reimburse qualified doulas in amounts that are reasonable and
adequate for the services provided and that are consistent with the
reimbursement rates set by other states’ Medicaid programs.
Sec. 7. STATE PLAN AMENDMENT
Not later than July 1, 2026, the Department of Vermont Health Access shall
seek a state plan amendment from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
Services to allow Vermont’s Medicaid program to provide coverage for doula
services in accordance with 33 V.S.A. § 1901n, as added by this act.
VT LEG #384207 v.1

No. 50 Page 8 of 8
2025
Sec. 8. EFFECTIVE DATES
(a) Secs. 1–4 (establishing certification program for community-based
perinatal doulas) shall take effect on July 1, 2026, provided that the Director of
the Office of Professional Regulation shall commence the rulemaking process
prior to that date in order to ensure that the rules will be in effect on July 1,
2026.
(b) Sec. 5 (33 V.S.A. § 1901n; Medicaid coverage for doula services) shall
take effect on the later of July 1, 2026 or approval of the state plan amendment
requested pursuant to Sec. 7 of this act.
(c) The remaining sections shall take effect on passage.
Date Governor signed bill: June 9, 2025
VT LEG #384207 v.1